Maine, session 132, LD2048.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §1103, sub-§3, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 303, §2, is amended
to read:
C. Consent to permit the director to conduct a criminal background check history
record check;
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA §1103, sub-§3, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 303, §2, is amended
to read:
H. The methods by which the fantasy contest operator will protect a fantasy
contestant's personal and private information; and
Sec. 3. 8 MRSA §1103, sub-§3, ¶H-1 is enacted to read:
H-1. Disclosure of each person that has control over the applicant as described in
subsection 3-A; and
Sec. 4. 8 MRSA §1103, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Control over applicant or licensee. The following are considered to have
control over an applicant or a licensee:
A. In the case of an applicant or a licensee that is a corporation, each corporate holding
company, parent company or subsidiary company of the applicant or licensee and each
person that owns 10% or more of the applicant or licensee and that has the ability to
control the activities of the applicant or licensee or elect a majority of the board of
directors of the applicant or licensee, except for a bank or other licensed lending
institution that holds a mortgage or other lien acquired in the ordinary course of
business;
B. In the case of an applicant or licensee that is not a corporation, each person
associated with the applicant or licensee that directly or indirectly holds a beneficial or
proprietary interest in the applicant's or licensee's business operation or that the director
otherwise determines has the ability to control the noncorporate applicant or licensee;
and
C. Key personnel of the applicant or licensee, including any executive, employee or
agent, having the power to exercise significant influence over decisions concerning any
part of the applicant's or licensee's relevant business operation.
Sec. 5. 8 MRSA §1103, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Criminal history record check. The director shall request a criminal history
record check in accordance with this subsection for each applicant for an initial license and
for each person required to be disclosed by an applicant for an initial license under
subsection 3, paragraph H-1. The director may require a criminal history record check in
accordance with this subsection for a licensee seeking to renew a license and from any
person having control over the licensee as part of the license renewal application and from
any person identified by the licensee under subsection 3-A. A criminal history record check
conducted pursuant to this subsection must include criminal history record information
obtained from the Maine Criminal Justice Information System established in Title 16,
section 631 and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
Page 1 - 132LR2876(01)

A. Criminal history record information obtained from the Maine Criminal Justice
Information System pursuant to this subsection must include a record of public criminal
history record information as defined in Title 16, section 703, subsection 8.
B. Criminal history record information obtained from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation pursuant to this subsection must include other state and national criminal
history record information.
C. An individual required to submit to a criminal history record check under this
subsection shall submit to having the individual's fingerprints taken. The State Police,
upon payment by the individual of the fee required under paragraph E, shall take or
cause to be taken the individual's fingerprints and shall immediately forward the
fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police, State Bureau
of Identification. Any person who fails to transmit criminal fingerprint records to the
State Bureau of Identification pursuant to this paragraph is subject to the provisions of
Title 25, section 1550.
D. The Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police, State Bureau of
Identification shall conduct the state and national criminal history record checks
required under this subsection. Except for the portion of a payment, if any, that
constitutes the processing fee for a criminal history record check charged by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, all money received by the State Police under this subsection
must be paid to the Treasurer of State, who shall apply the money to the expenses
incurred by the Department of Public Safety in the administration of this subsection.
E. The director shall by rule set the amount of the fee to be paid for each criminal
history record check required to be performed under this subsection.
F. The subject of a Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history record check may
obtain a copy of the criminal history record check by following the procedures outlined
in 28 Code of Federal Regulations, Sections 16.32 and 16.33. The subject of a state
criminal history record check may inspect and review the criminal history record
information pursuant to Title 16, section 709.
G. State and national criminal history record information obtained by the director
under this subsection may be used only for the purpose of screening an applicant for a
license or a license renewal under this chapter.
H. All criminal history record information obtained by the director pursuant to this
subsection is confidential, is for the official use of the director only and may not be
disseminated by the director or disclosed to any other person or entity except as
provided in paragraph F.
I. The director, after consultation with the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of
State Police, State Bureau of Identification, shall adopt rules to implement this
subsection.
Sec. 6. 8 MRSA §1103, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 303, §2, is amended to
read:
5. Application Processing fee. The director may establish by rule and charge a one-
time application processing fee limited to the projected cost of processing the application
and performing any background investigations. If the application fee exceeds the actual
for the cost of processing the an application and performing background investigations, the
Page 2 - 132LR2876(01)

415 excess amount must be applied to the license fee, if the applicant is issued a license, or
426 reimbursed to an applicant not subject to a license fee in accordance with subsection 6 or
437 to an applicant that was not issued a license. If the actual cost exceeds the projected cost,
448 an additional fee may be charged to meet the actual cost.
Sec. 7. 8 MRSA §1103, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 303, §2, is amended to
read:
6. License Application fee; term. The nonrefundable application fee for an initial
license and a license renewal fee for a license for a fantasy contest operator that had gross
fantasy contest revenues during the 12 months preceding application equal to or greater
than $100,000 is $2,500. A fantasy contest operator that had gross fantasy contest revenues
during the 12 months preceding application of less than $100,000 is not required to pay a
license fee. Licenses must be renewed annually.
Sec. 8. 8 MRSA §1103, sub-§6-A is enacted to read:
6-A. Occupational license fee; term; renewal. The fee for an occupational license
for a fantasy contest operator is $250 for an initial license and $250 to renew a license for
a one-year term. Licenses must be renewed annually. The fee may be paid on behalf of the
occupational licensee by the operator. In addition to a renewal fee, an occupational licensee
must annually submit a renewal application on a form or in a format approved by the
director. Fees paid under this subsection must be retained by the director for the cost of
administering this chapter.